Idaho statutes. Title 35 FENCES
Chapter 2
INCLOSURES OF RESERVOIRS AND DUMPS

Sec.

§ 35-201. Quartz mills — Reservoirs and dumps to be inclosed.

The owner or operator of any quartz mill must inclose with a good and substantial fence, sufficient to turn stock, all reservoirs and dumps or other material, known to contain that which is injurious to the health of stock.

§ 35-202. Liability for failure to inclose.

Every person who fails to comply with the provisions of section 35-201[, Idaho Code,] is liable to the owner of any stock injured by drinking the water or acids that flow from such mill, in twice the damage sustained.